District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.03

Determination of residency.

(a)

A resident of the District of Columbia is one who is living in the District of Columbia voluntarily and not for a temporary purpose; that is, one with no intention of presently removing himself or herself therefrom. A child is residing in the District if he or she is making his or her home in the District.

(b)

Temporary absence from the District, with subsequent returns to the District, or intent to return when the purposes of the absence have been accomplished, shall not interrupt continuity of residence.

(c)

Residence as defined for eligibility purposes shall not depend upon the reason for which the individual entered the District, except insofar as it may bear on whether he is there for a temporary purpose.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 503, 29 DCR 1060
This section is referenced in § 4-204.07, § 4-251.03, and § 4-751.01.
1981 Ed., § 3-205.3.